Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.010

Director candidates in undivided districts—Indication of term sought—How elected.

Whenever the directors to be elected in a school district that is not divided into directors' districts are not all to be elected for the same term of years, the county auditor shall distinguish them and designate the same as provided for in RCW 29A.24.020, and assign position numbers thereto as provided in RCW 28A.343.320 and each candidate shall indicate on his or her declaration of candidacy the term for which he or she seeks to be elected and position number for which he or she is filing. The candidate receiving the largest number of votes for each position shall be deemed elected.

[ 2015 c 53 s 9; 1990 c 33 s 317; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.334. Prior: 1959 c 268 s 12. Formerly RCW 28A.315.560, 28A.57.334, 28.57.420.]